Utah statutes.
63M-6-203.   Certain improvements, alterations, and expansions prohibited.

(1)  A person or entity may not begin to develop, or authorize development, on any land identified in this chapter until the Governor's Office of Economic Development has affirmatively authorized the development of the land because the development is consistent with those uses identified in the Hill Air Force Base AICUZ Land Use Compatibility Guidelines Study, as amended, dated October 1982.

(2)  Nothing in this chapter prohibits any property owner from improving, altering, or expanding any existing residential or commercial use of the property owner's property so long as the improvement, alteration, or expansion does not materially increase the human density of that present use.

